Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 256,746,914
(2) Child welfare, self-
sufficiency and vocational
rehabilitation services........... $ 927,941,652
(3) Aging and people with
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs.............  $ 1,917,327,398
(4) Debt service ..........................  $ 4,893,959
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
Medicare receipts and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security
Supplemental Security Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected or received
by the Department of Human Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 39,821,481
(2) Child welfare, self-
sufficiency and vocational
rehabilitation services........... $ 130,703,876
(3) Aging and people with
disabilities and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5526 (SB 5526-A) Page 1
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs............. $ 255,582,738
(4) Shared services ..................... $ 125,387,050
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2017
Act, collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 213,190,489
(2) Child welfare, self-
sufficiency and vocational
rehabilitation services...........  $ 1,012,279,442
(3) Aging and people with
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs.............  $ 4,098,193,248
SECTION 4.
For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Department
of Human Services for federal supplemental nutrition assistance payments are not limited.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $750,000,  to be allocated to the Department of Human Services for fos-
ter parent supports.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5526 (SB 5526-A) Page 2